District of Columbia statutes.
7-2303

Transmittal of plan or program to Council.

(a)

The Mayor shall transmit to the Council of the District of Columbia complete copies of any existing plan or program prepared pursuant to § 201 of the Disaster Relief Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. § 5121) within 30 calendar days of March 5, 1981. The plan or program shall be valid only if the Council of the District of Columbia does not adopt, within 30 days (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays and days on which the Council of the District of Columbia is in recess according to its rules) after the receipt of the plan or program from the Mayor, a resolution disapproving the plan or program.

(b)

The Mayor shall transmit to the Council of the District of Columbia complete copies of any plan or program prepared pursuant to this section within 30 calendar days of the completion of the plan or program. The plan or program shall be valid only if the Council of the District of Columbia does not adopt, within 30 days (excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays and days on which the Council of the District of Columbia is in recess according to its rules) after receipt of the plan or program from the Mayor, a resolution disapproving the plan or program.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-149, § 4, 27 DCR 4886
1981 Ed., § 6-1503.